Welcome to the huberman Lab podcast. We discussed science science basic tools for everyday life. I'm Andrew huberman, and I'm a professor of neurobiology and Ophthalmology at Stanford school of medicine. Today. We are going to discuss sugar in particular how our nervous system, regulate, our sugar intake and are seeking of sugar. We're also going to discuss how sugar regulates our nervous system and as you'll soon, learn sugar really impacts our brain and body by two main mechanism. One of those mechanisms is based on the Sweet Taste of sugar which itself is rewarding, even if you're not much of a sweet tooth, I confess. I'm not most people enjoy sweet taste more than bitter taste, and the Sweet Taste of sugar. And its various forms is strongly reinforcing. Meaning it triggers the activation of neurons nerve cells in the brain and body that make us want to consume more of that sweet substance. Incidentally sweet taste also make us want to eat more of other substances as well. You may be familiar with that phenomenon. Now sugar also triggers mechanisms in the brain and body based on its nutritive content independent. Its sweetness. What that means is that the actual caloric content and the way that Sugar interacts with your nervous system at a subconscious level without your awareness, also impacts your breathing and speaking of sugar and other Foods today. We are going to discuss what happens when you ingest sugar in terms of your body's reaction and your brains reaction. We also going to talk about what happens when you don't ingest enough sugar. Cuz it turns out sugar is such a powerful fuel for the brain that under conditions, where people don't ingest enough sugar or where their so-called blood glucose, which is basically blood sugar of a particular form, get to low their neurons, don't function as well. Said their conditions of very low blood sugar in which neurons can function even better. So today we're going to talk about the ins-and-outs the ups and downs of sugar, as it relates to your nervous system. And by the end of this episode, I'm confident you have a much clearer picture as to how much sugar you should be ingesting weather. Now. You should avoid sugars that you're currently eating and you will certainly understand much more about the energy and fuel sources that your brain relies on which I'm certain, will allow you to make better informed choices about the food you eat and avoid for the mental health, physical, health and performance. I'm pleased to announce that I'm hosting to live event. This May 1st. Live event will be hosted in Seattle, Washington on May 17th. S live event will be hosted in Portland, Oregon on May 18th. Both are part of a lecture series entitled, The Brain body contract during which I will discuss science and find Space tools for mental health, physical health, and performance. And I should point out that while some of the material, I'll cover will overlap with information, cover here on the huberman Lab podcast and on various social media post. Most of the information I will cover is going to be distinct from information, covered on the podcast or elsewhere. Once again, at Seattle on May 17th. Portland on May 18th. You can access tickets by going to huberman lab.com tour. And I hope to see you there. Before we begin, I'd like to emphasize that this podcast is separate from my teaching and research roles at Stanford. It is however, part of my desire, an effort to bring zero cost to Consumer information about science and science related tools to the general public in keeping with that theme. I'd like to thank the sponsors of today's podcast. Our first sponsor is thesis thesis makes what are called nootropics, which means it's smart. Drugs, be honest. I'm not a fan of the term nootropics. I don't believe in smart drugs. In the sense that I don't believe that there's any one substance, or collection of substances that can make us smarter. I do believe based on science. However, that there are particular, neural circuits and brain functions that allow it to be more focused, more alert accept creativity, be more motivated States. And so the idea of a nootropic that's just going to make us smarter all-around fail, to acknowledge that smarter is many things, right? If you're an artist or a musician, you're doing math, you're doing accounting a different part of the day you need to be Create a bees are all different. Brain processing fees understands this. And as far as I know that the first nootropics company to create Target in nootropics for specific outcomes. The only has the highest quality ingredients, which of course is essential. Some of those I've talked about on the podcast, things like DHA, ginkgo biloba phosphatidylserine. They give you the ability to try several different plans over the course of a month, discover, which nootropics work best for your brain, chemistry and genetics and goals. And with that person was Asian design, a kit of nootropics does ideal for the different brain and body States. You want to access. I've been using thesis for more than six months now and I can confidently say that they were trouble. Been a total Game Changer. My go-to formula is the clarity formula or sometimes I'll use their energy formula before training to get your own personalized. Nootropic starter. Kick go online to take Visa stock, cam huberman, take a 3-minute quiz and pieces will send you four different formulas to try and your first month that take this is.com huberman and use the code Huber minute. Check out for 10%. Your first order. Today's episode is also brought To Us by athletic greens now called ag1 athletic greens as an all-in-one, vitamin mineral. Probiotic drink. I've been taking out, let it greens since 2012. So I'm delighted that. They're sponsoring the podcast. The reason I started taking athletic Greens in the reason. I still take out by the greens once or twice a day. Is that it helps me? Cover all of my basic nutritional needs. It makes up for any deficiencies that. I might have an addition that has probiotics which are vital for microbiome Health. I've done a couple of episodes now on the so-called gut microbiome and the ways in which the microbiome interacts, with your immune system, with your brain to regulate mood and associate with every biological system relevant to help throughout your brain and body. With a lot of greens. I get the vitamins. I need the minerals. I need, and the probiotics to support my microbiome. If you'd like to try athletic greens, you can go to athletic greens.com cooperman and play. My special offer will give you five free travel packs, which make it easy to mix up athletic greens while you're on the road plus a year. Supply of vitamin D3 K2 ton of data. Now showing that vitamin D3 is essential for various aspects of our brain and body Health, even if we're getting a lot of sunshine, many of us are still deficient in vitamin D3. And K2 is also important because it regulates things like cardiovascular function calcium in the body. And so on again, go to athletic.com to claim the special offer of the five free travel packs and the year supply of vitamin D3 K2. Today's episode is also brought insidetracker insidetracker has a personalized nutrition platform that analyzes data from your blood and DNA help. You better understand your body and help you reach your health goals. I've long been a believer in getting regular blood work done. For the simple reason that many of the factors that impact your immediate and long-term Health can only be obsessed with a quality blood test. What's unique about insidetracker. Is that while there are a lot of different tests out there for hormones and metabolic factor is etcetera. With insidetracker, you get the numbers back in terms of your levels, but they also give you very clear, directives and trim. Lifestyle nutrition and supplementation, they can help you. Bring those values into the ranges that are best for you and your health goals and that's very different than a lot of the other programs where you get a lot of information. We don't really know what to do with that information inside. Tractor makes it all very easy to understand and very actionable based on the very easy to use dashboard at insidetracker. If you'd like to try insidetracker, you can visit inside tracker.com huberman, get 20% off, any of the inside. Tracker's plans. Just use the code, hubermann at checkout. Okay, let's talk about sugar. Let's talk about how sugar impacts your brain and how your brain impacts your Pursuit for your avoidance of sugar. Let's get a few things out of the way. First. The first thing is that there's nothing inherently bad about sugar. I know who the word sugar gets a bad rap nowadays and indeed, you're going to hear over and over again. During the podcasts that consuming, a lot of refined sugars. In particular, high fructose, corn syrup is known to have a very large number of bad effects on the brain and body. I don't know that there's anyone that really debates that anymore, even if we just agree and I think we should all agree on the so-called calories in calories out, principle of thermodynamics more energy than we burn. We are going to gain weight. If we ingest less energy than we burn, we are generally going to lose weight. And if the two things are in Balance ingestion and burning of energy, well, then we're going to maintain weight. So everyone agrees on that. I agree on that. But beyond that there are a number of ways in which particular nutrient in the case of today's episode sugar. Back the ways of the brain works such that we tend to seek out more a particular nutrients. For instance. If we eat sugar, there are two or at least two mechanisms by which We crave more sugar than most people are aware of that experience. But today I'm going to explain exactly how that works. But also that when we ingest sugar, it has a bunch of different effects on the way that our neural circuits work that can allow us to be more or less focused more or less agitated more or less happy more or less depressed in some cases. So today as we explore this thing. We're calling Sugar, We're Going to explore that mainly in the context of the nervous system. But also in the context of how the nervous system regulates many many functions and behaviors that are important to all of you, you're do, you think you're going to exercise, your ability, gain weight, lose weight, whatever your goals might happen to be Sugar plays a critical role in achieving those goals. And in some cases, if you're ingesting too much of the wrong times of the wrong form, sugar can actually impede those goals. In fact, sugar can prevent all the right behaviors from allowing you to achieve the goals that you want. So today we are going to play Sugar into its proper context. The way I want to start off by doing that, is to tell you a little bit of what happens when we eat in a little bit of what the brain does to respond to those events. So what happens when we eat, I've done it in Fire episode on metabolism. So if you're interested in the full cast of hormonal and neural events that occurs when we eat, please check out that episode before. Sake of today's discussion. Let's just take away what I called top, Contour view of the hormonal response, to ingesting food. Now, anytime we eat, that is a consequence of a number of things that happened. Before we ate, there's a hormone in our brain and body called the ghrelin. Spelled g a R e. L i n is a hormone that increases depending on how long it's been since we ate last. Okay. So the longer it's been since we had a meal growing levels are going to be higher and higher and higher and it essentially makes us hungry by interacting with particular neurons, in an area of the brain called the arcuate nucleus of the hypothalamus and some other areas as well, like the lateral hypothalamus. You don't need to know the name of those brain areas. But if you'd like to know them there they are growing increases. It tends to make us hungry. And then when we eat typically what happens is ghrelin levels, go down. So it's a very logical system. Now when we eat assuming that we eat carbohydrates, but even if we just eat some protein in some fat, we will experience a slight or in some cases, a large rise in blood glucose. Blood. Glucose is complete blood sugar. And the body and brain we should say particular the nervous system doesn't function. Well, if blood sugar is too high or too low. So as a consequence we have another hormone, which is released from the pancreas, which is called insulin which helps regulate the amount of glucose in the blood stream. So even if you were to ingest, an entire cup and 8, oz cup of pure table sugar, which would send your blood glucose very, very high. Assuming that you have a normal insulin response that you're not diabetic that insulin response would help clamp that blood glucose level so that it did not cause damage to your brain and body. Because if blood sugar goes to high is actually toxic to neurons and other cells of your body can kill them off and neurons of the central nervous system and brain and spinal cord. Once they are dead. They do not come back. So your biological systems understand this at a biological level that is and prevent that death of cells due to high blood sugar by keeping. Insulin around in order to clamp blood glucose diabetics. We call them type 1 diabetics. You don't make insulin have to take insulin when they eat in particular, when they eat foods, that raise their blood sugar specifically to avoid that neurotoxicity in the other deleterious effects of high blood sugar goes up the longer. It's been since we've eaten since the stimulate hunger when we eat grow in is suppressed, blood glucose typically goes up, especially when we take carbohydrate-containing meal, when blood glucose goes up. It's regulated in the body. Meaning it's Peaks and it's valleys are more like Smooth it out and that glucose is sequestered. It's taken away where it needs to be taken away. And in certain locations, it's delivered to cells so that those cells can use the glucose. Now, one of the chief organs for glucose utilization is the brain neurons are tremendously metabolically active and their preferred mode of metabolism is glucose metabolism. In other words, Basically run on sugar which is not to say that you should eat a lot of sugar, as you'll see today. There are states of mind and body from since fasted state in which people report having immense amounts of mental Clarity and their blood glucose is actually quite low. So it is simply not the case that the more sugar that you ingest. They better that your brain will function but it is the case that for most people, many people are not on a ketogenic or very low carbohydrate diet. They're not adapted to low carbohydrate diet that neurons in their brain and body are using glucose in order to function. That's what allows those neurons to fire electrical, potentials. That's how we refer to it. Firing meaning, sending electrical signals down their life to communicate with other neuron to illustrate. Just how important glucose is for brain function. I'd like to describe a study that just recently came out that sits on a long history of similar studies, but the one that just came out as particularly interesting. Now, I want to point out that unless I say otherwise, I'm going to refer to typical diets. Meaning I have to believe that most people out. There are ingesting, some starch or carbohydrate. I do realize that our people following very low carbohydrate diets or moderately carbohydrate diet. I even though there's some folks out there who on the so-called carnivore diet, the only meat and organs to be a little fruit, but I'm going to assume that the vast majority of people, listening ingest proteins and carbohydrates. So unless I say ketogenic William besides ketosis itself, which I will, I'm referring to a kind of typical site where people are consuming fats proteins and carbohydrates. I count myself as a one such individual. Some point. I might try the carnivore diet, who knows. I might try, if you're vegan diet, who knows? But for my entire life up until now, I'm 46 years old. I've been a proud omnivore meaning of high-quality as much as I can unprocessed foods that trying to really avoid highly processed foods, but I do eat from those three macronutrient group of proteins, carbohydrates, and fats. And I'm going to assume that most of you do Well, the study I like to emphasize. Recorded from neurons nerve cells in the brain, in particular in the part of the brain that responds to visual images so called the visual cortex and neurons in the visual cortex are beautifully tuned. As we say, two particular features of what we see. The primary example of this, the kind of classic example is if you put a little extra next to a neuron in your visual cortex, or if we put you into an FR, fmri scanner machine which can detect neural activity. And I were to show you a bunch of just Little lines in a bars of light. They can be dark bars of life. That could be a light bars of light on a screen in front of you. So someone be vertical horizontal. So we'll be at 45°, what we would see is that some neurons respond. Best mean in a fire. A lot of electrical activity to vertical lines, other ones, respond to horizontal lines and others respond to 45 degree line. And this so-called orientation tuning in orientation of life, is a cardinal plastic feature of the way that your visual system is built. And everything that you see, whether it's a face or a dog or a cat, or landscape is built up from these very simple. Neuron responses. In other words, when you look at a face, there are neurons deep in the brain that respond to faces, but the only reason that those neurons can respond to those faces is because they receive signals from your aunt and your visual cortex some of which responded vertical line some of which respond to horizontal lines and somewhat respond to 45 degree line. And all those are built up walked by which you see a face and you recognize a face is really an amazing phenomenon happens. Very, very fast. You never noticed that you're doing this, but everything is built up from these fundamental orientation. Tune neurons. Now, orientation to neurons, are so fundamental that they are the building blocks by, which you make up all other things that you see, it's the way you read, is the way that you recognize faces as I mentioned, and everything else. Experimentally, it's quite straightforward to measure how sharply tuned one of these neurons is. In other words. If I were to show you a vertical line and find a neuron in your brain that responds to vertical line. I could also ask whether or not that neuron fires any electrical activity in response to a line that degrees or 30 degrees. And what I eventually would find is that, that neuron was orientation tune over a particular range of angles. It's not only going to respond respond to her about ten degrees off vertical in either side, but probably not much more maybe 20, but usually is going to be anywhere from vertical to just tilted slightly, okay? In a recent experiment that was published in the journal neuron cell Press Journal. Excellent journal. The author. That's a really interesting question. They asked whether or not the sharpness of tuning, the Precision of orientation tuning of these neurons is dependent on blood glucose level. So just to cut to the chase, to give you the answer, what they found is that when subjects are well-fed neurons that responded to Vertical responded, very strongly to Vertical, but not very much at all to other angles of we called stimuli that lines that are 10 degrees or twenty degrees off. If they look at neurons that work primarily tune ride that preferred horizontal line. They found the same thing. OK. Google on the sharpness. The Precision of tuning of neurons in the brain was best when subjects were fed and conversely, when subjects were fasted the orientation, tuning of these neurons became much broader, what it meant. Was that a neuron that normally would only respond to Vertical. Now, responded to other angles of lines as well. You might say, well, that's great, right? These wrongs that, at one point can only do one thing or not to and other things, but it's not so great. Because what that means is that, in the fasted State, your perception of the outside world is actually distorted. It's blurred. It's not as precise as it is, when you're set in when I say said what I really mean is when glucose is available to neuron. Now for some of you may be many of you and including myself intermittent fasting or some variant thereof is that Philly estate that. I like it allows me to focus ring since I was, I mentioned before and even earlier in this podcast, I tend to eat my first meal sometime around 11 a.m., And then I generally my last meal sometime around 8 p.m. Plus, or minus an hour on either side. I'm not super strict about an occasional wake up, really hungry and I'll eat something before 11 a.m. I'm not super strict about these intermittent fasting thing. It just seems to be how my appetite works best in my schedule, Etc. In the morning, I tend to be most focused and I always associate that with the fact that I was faster. Just water and some caffeine in about ninety minutes after waking up. I drink my caffeine, but I hydrate from the time, I get up at cetera at cetera. And I know a lot of other people have had the experience of being faster than feeling like they have a lot of mental Clarity. When you are in a fasted State. Typically, you are going to use fuels that are available to the neuron based on your intake of food. The day before, maybe it's your using, some glycogen may be using some fat may be using some blood sugar. That's the ride from other storage sites in the body. Don't actually use fat as a fuel source for neurons under typical conditions, but there are ways in which proteins and fats and glycogen etcetera are converted into fuel batner on can use. What's interesting about this study is that the study says that when well-fed, meaning when blood glucose sugar is at properly elevated level. In the bloodstream, it can be delivered to the brain in a way that allows Iran to work best, which is really all just underscores the point that I made earlier, which is that your nervous system is extremely metabolically demanding and it loves glucose. Glucose is not that you should avoid fasting away from the study is that there are elements of the fasted state in particular, the elevations and things like the nephron and norepinephrine. Also called adrenaline and noradrenaline. That can give us this kind of clarity of mind that many people are pursuing when they fast. That's kind of one of the reasons a lot of people fast they like the way that they feel mentally and physically. But I think it's only fair to point out that glucose is the preferred source of fuel for the brain. And this study that I mention is one of many studies that have explored how nutritional status or blood glucose status in the brain and body fluids normal tuning in the rental function and it really points to the fact that ultimately your brain as an organ, is a glucose. Consuming machine. Now, when you eat a food that food is broken down and if it contains carbohydrates is going to be converted into glucose, + glucose, can't get directly into the brain. As a fuel source. It actually has to be carried across the so-called blood-brain barrier, the BBB and the actual metabolism of glucose and the delivery of the glucose to the neurons is carried out by a different cell type in itself. That you should all know about, because it's the most abundant cell type in your brain and maybe even in your entire nervous system. That's the so-called astrocyte ostracize her one of several types of glia the word gleo means glue, but many people have taken that name Glee Igloo to think that all the only thing that the apps or sites are doing is just kind of holding things together. Actually the apps or sites were involved in, delivering glucose to the neuron, they are critically involved in shaping your neural function and brain plasticity. Brain's ability to change in response to experience. So these apps or sites are like the little waiters and waitresses. Bringing glucose to the neurons. And the neurons are going to do the heavy lifting that's involved in perception and behavior and actions. So if prior to this episode, you didn't already realize is that glucose blood sugar is vital to the function of your brain and other neurons of your nervous system. Now, you know, and for those of you that have experienced the increase in mental Clarity, that comes after a properly timed properly composed, meaning as the right macronutrients in the write ratios in a properly sized meal. Well, then now you have justification for eating something in as a way to improve the way that your brain works. It turns out of your brain is going to work. Best when it's got glucose available, whether you like too fast or not. That's just the reality of things. The same thing is also true for the neurons in your body, the way that you are able to move the limbs of your body wave, you are able to perform exercise or movement of any kind for that matter is because neurons called motor neurons. Send electrical potentials to the muscle fibers. They release a neurotransmitter called acetylcholine which causes contraction of the muscle fibers and allows you to move your limbs. Those neurons are also very metabolically demanding, especially when you're doing demanding types of physical work and I can recycling it running or weight lifting or yoga or whatever. It may be. Those neurons require a ton of glucose. If you've ever had the experience of having to think very hard about how you're generating a movement or force yourself to continue to endure in a given exercise. You might have thought, you know, I'm running out of fuel. That's why I'm getting tired. It's hard to do. That's actually the case sometimes but that's not always the case. One of the reasons that it feels like work is because of your so-called upper motor neuron. So when the control the lower motor neurons in your spinal cord with control your muscles, they have to be very metabolically active. It's one thing to engage in a reflexive movement. Were you just walking around if you're running continuously, but when you suddenly have to focus on what you're doing and you have to generate specific Patterns of motor movement. Well, that's feels to Bandung because one it increases the release of its rental in in your brain and body which makes you feel a little bit agitated and more alert, but also, deliberate fought deliberately controlling the way that your brain and body is moving requires, more glucose, uptake more energy in those hurry Neurontin. This is also why, after doing a long bout of exercise, you might be tired, but also, if you do I doubt a skill learning of any kind or if you've been reading and thinking about what you were reading or if you had a intense conversation with somebody really forcing yourself to listen and hopefully they're listening to you too. And you're really trying to parse what they're saying and they are doing that right now and you're trying to really track something that's work and that work requires glucose uptake by neurons within the brain and in your body. Now that we've established a glucose is the preferred source of fuel for the nervous system. Like to concentrate on a few of the other types of sugars that we ingest on a common basis and the impact that those have on brain function and body function. I particularly like to focus on fructose. Fructose, of course, is found in fruit. It's also found in the infamous high fructose corn syrup, which we will talk about today. It's worth pointing out that the concentrations of fructose in fruits is quite low compared to the concentrations of fructose and high-fructose corn syrup. High fructose corn syrup is approximately 50% for atos, which turns out to be an enormously high percentage of Anything really? That's what you want me to contrast that to the concentrations of fructose in fruits, fruits have other types of sugars in them as well as sucrose content of most fruit. And fruit juices is low. So there are some fruits, like you do, melons peaches pineapples, do for that contain, you know, little less than 10% or so of sucrose things like, mangoes can have a lot of sucrose, but typically the amount of fructose fructose is anywhere from 1%. To about 10%, right? It's really going to vary quite a bit. And many of you have probably heard of the TOEFL glycemic index, which is a, basically, a measure of how fast blood sugar rise, after eating particular Foods. It said we're going to set aside the glycemic index for now. We will come back to it. It has some relationship to the concentrations of fructose in Fruit, but the point I'd like to make is that fructose as a sugar is handled very differently in the body then is glucose. But I also want to emphasize that because the percentage of fructose in fruit is rather low, especially compared to high fructose corn syrup. Many people have demonized fructose and high-fructose makes you fat or that fruit makes you fat. If you look at the data that's not really the case. The fact of the matter is that the concentrations of fructose in fruits are so low. That unless someone is consuming a lot of fruit for their consuming, a lot of fruit on the backdrop of a highly processed diet or a guy that has a lot of other stuff that they might not want to be ingesting. You can't really say that freak ptosis fattening. I don't really think that there's any basis for saying that fructose itself as bad now, high fructose corn syrup is a different issue and too much consumption of anything, but fructose included with a knot comes fruit or otherwise, I can be a problem for the ways that impact the neural circuit that processed sugar not just glucose or fructose. And to illustrate, those neural circuits in a bit and we'll become very clear to all of you. Regardless of whether I have a background in biology, your metabolism nutrition or otherwise, white ingesting, very high concentrations of fructose is not Be a good thing for the way that your brain functions. One of the key distinctions between glucose and fructose is that fructose, most likely cannot directly access the brain. It actually needs to be converted into glucose in the liver. And the way that conversion occurs feeds back to a set of hormones and neural Pathways that we talked about earlier. We have a lot to do with appetite and she just summarize, what is now? A lot of very solid data. Fructose and specifically, fructose has the ability to reduce certain hormones and peptides in our body whose main job is to suppress ghrelin. As you were called. Ghrelin is a hormone that increases the longer. It's been since we've eaten and Grill and makes us hungry by stimulating particular neurons in our hypothalamus. It actually makes us really want to eat and in particular really makes us want to eat sugary and fatty foods, reduces the activity of the hormones that reduce ghrelin and for the neck consequence of that is that fructose increases ghrelin. So although I and I think pretty much everyone out there safe for a few individuals agrees that calories in calories out at the fundamental principle of weight loss. My weight maintenance or ingesting fructose shifts are hormone system. And as a consequence, our neural Pathways within our brain, the hypothalamus Be hungrier. Regardless of how many calories we beat now. I also want to be absolutely clear. This does not mean that eating an apple or eating a melon or even a couple of apricots or something is going to make you hyper sejic. Meaning it's going to make you just want to eat and eat the meat. That's simply not the case. But if you compare fructose and you compare glucose not only are they metabolize differently in the brain and body, but in addition to that fructose has this impact of reducing the hormones, that reduce hunger hormone and neural circuits. And so fructose does have this kind of twists and it's a phenotype right? Or it's a dating profile. This would be a kind of a red flag in in that profile because fructose itself while it's actually a pretty good fuel source and in many ways and it's often packaged in things like fruits, which bring along fiber and vitamins and minerals that I think for many of us. Things that we should be eating more of an adjusting more of, it can suppress the pathways that suppress hunger. And as a consequence, it can increase hunger. So current recommendations for most people are to eat more fruits and vegetables. But for those of you that are trying to control your hunger ingesting, a lot of fructose is probably not going to be a good idea. Certainly ingesting it from high fructose corn syrup is not going to be good idea because of the enormous percentages of fructose and high-fructose, corn syrup 50% or sometimes even more. But even from fruit, some people will find that fruit really quenches. Our appetite. Other people will find it. That fruit stimulates their appetite and I suppose if you're trying to stimulate your appetite than ingesting, more fruit might actually be advantageous to you fructose provides a bridge for us between a particular kind of sugar hormone function. In the state's growing and the hypothalamus which leads us to the next question, which is what is it about? Sugar that makes it such an attractive thing for us. Why do we like it so much? And the obvious answer that most people arrive at is, will it just tastes really, really good, but that's actually not the way it works. The rewarding properties. As we say, of sugar weather. They come in the form of sucrose or fructose or foods that increase glucose to a, a very high-level actually is not just related to The Taste of the foods that produce the elevation in glucose glucose or fructose. It isn't part, but that's only part of the story and the rest of the story. Once you understand, it can actually place you in a position to much better control your sugar intake of all kind, but also your food intake in ways that can allow you to make much better choices about the food. You ingest. I'm actually at this point. I should probably give a confession. Said today and I'll say it again. Then I set it on previous podcast. I don't have much of a sweet tooth in indeed. That's true. I can get a pass on chocolate or ice cream or things like that. Seems like with each successive Year. Sweet things are less, and less appealing to me, of course, of Savory Foods. Anything that is really fatty salty, Savory, those don't last long in my presence, but I will say, I don't really likes sweet things so much, and I don't like sweet people, but I don't tend to like sweet food which is true, but there's probably one exception and that's mangoes and turns out that mangoes have the highest percentage of sugar in them in particular fructose as well as other forms of sugars. So what I do because I love a mango so much as I will have mangoes probably twice a week, but I'll have them after some sort of resistance training or hard Ron or something like that because it is the case that after you exercise hard in particular exercise. That is a high intensity of rye. That your body is more efficient at using circulating blood sugar, its able to store that use that for fuel. And so they went all typically do is just take the mango actually eat the peel to. I know they're probably some people going to cringe when they hear that. I find them delicious. I just bite into those things like apples. I don't eat the pits. However, so now I want to explain the Pathways in the brain and body. That regulates our appetite for sugar. Keep in mind when I already told you before, which is that when we ingest foods that are broken down into various components, and glucose is going to be shuttle to the brain. And of course, the other neurons in our spinal cord and elsewhere muscles, Etc. In order for all of those cells and organs and tissues to be able to function. The fact that so many cells and organs and tissues require glucose in order to function, has led to a situation where you have dedicated neural Machinery pieces of your brain that are almost entirely if not entirely devoted to seeking out of sugar or foods that contain sugars and to make sure that you not only seek those out. But you know where those foods are and that you ingest more and more and more of them. And there are two main ways that these neural circuits work. In fact, we can say that there are two neural circuits entirely that work in parallel. And this is a common theme throughout the nervous system. And that's parallel Pathways parallel pathways are the ways that you can distinguish light from dark parallel path. Ways are the ways that you can distinguish high-pitch sounds from low pitch. Sound parallel Pathways of the ways that you can flex your muscles vs. Extend your muscles. For instance. If you move your wrist closer to your shoulder, your flexing, your bicep and you're actually inhibiting Russia preventing the action of Tricep, if you move here, you are wrist away from your shoulder, you are essentially using your extensor, your tricep and your inhibiting, the activity of your bicep. So for every function in your body that you might think is controlled by one brain area or one neural circuit. Almost always there are two or more so-called parallel path that particular Behavior happened in the case of sugar consumption, the two parallel Pathways involve one pathway related to the actual taste and the perception of sweet taste that lead. Not just you but every animal that we're aware of to seek more sweet containing foods, The other parallel pathway is related to the nutritive component of sweet food, meaning the degree to, which a given food will raise blood glucose. I want to repeat that one pathway in your brain and body is devoted to getting you to seek out sweet tasting things that you perceive as sweet. And another parallel pathway is devoted to getting you to seek out food that lead to increases in blood glucose. It just so happens that the foods that lead to Big increases in blood. Glucose typically are associated with that sweet taste of. This is distinctly different than the neural Pathways that control seeking of Savory Foods, or salty food, or spicy foods for that matter or bitter Foods. The sweet pathway is what we would call. Hardwired it exist. As far as we know in every mammal, that even exist in fruit flies. And fruit fly basically getting sweet stuff into the body might seem He has a lot to do with the taste but it has just as much to do with the nutritive components that sweet tasting Foods carry, and the fact that your nervous system and so many cells in your brain and body run on glucose. If you were call earlier, I said, even if you ingest fructose for toes, can be converted into glucose in the liver. And I mention, of course, that fructose may actually work directly on the brain that still unclear for humans on the jury's still out on that. Will you will see but the fundamental thing to understand here is that when you think you want a piece of chocolate or you think you want a piece of cake or you're craving something sweet. You are both craving the taste and your neurons are literally craving the nutritive component that arrived with, with that taste and simply by understanding that can allow you to circumvent. Some of that Sugar Cravings that you might, otherwise be a complete hopelessness victim to also in this episode. I will talk about ways that You can undermine or Short Circuit the circuit if you will, in order to reduce sugar Cravings on a regular basis, if that's your goal to parallel Pathways, one of the parallel Pathways have to do a conscious perception. So animals of all kinds of mice, rats, and humans will prefer sugary taste to non-sugary taste. When we eat something that tastes sweet, we register that sweet taste by way of sweet receptors, literally little ports, or portals of neurons on our tongue end on a pallet lawn people don't realize this but there are a lot of taste receptors on the soft palate and around the mouth on the sides of the mouth. We're actually tasted things. Not just with your tongue with your entire mouth in your palate. So when you ingest something sweet very quickly, their signal sent from those neurons in your mouth to brain areas that caused you to seek out or at least pay attention to the source and the abundance of those sweet things. They literally change your perception. In fact, they're beautiful, neuroimaging, studies, that show. That when people ingest a sugary drink, their perception of images of foods, change very much to make those Foods appear more appetizing and not just foods that contain sugar results of the study. There's an increase for instance, in the perception of detail and images of ice cream. After you ingest a sweet drink, or you can put like a hard candy into your mouth. It will make you seek out sugary things more. It will make sure everything is, look more appetizing, but also other Foods, more appetizing. So, I think it's important that people recognize that fact that when you have a sweet taste in your mouth, or when you tasted something sweet in your mouth. I should say, your perception of food has a mediately shifted. These are fast neural Pathways, then we'll get into some of the brain structures in the moment. But these are fast neural Pathways that shift if your entire self toward seeking more sugary stuff and more food generally. Does that mean that you should never ingest anything? Sweet? No, certainly them not saying that. I don't have to decide for themselves. What the appropriate amount of sugar intake is, but I find it remarkable. When people say, oh, you know, I need to get my sugar fix. So I need to have my chocolate. Do I need to have a little bit of something? Going to take care of that Sugar appetite, because in taking care of that Sugar appetite, maybe for the very disciplined of you. You can just have that one piece of chocolate. It's great. You can Relish in it, but it does shift the way that you perceive other Foods as well. And the way it does that is through our probably if you're listening to this podcast now, old friend. But incredible neuromodulator dopamine. Dopamine is a molecule that is released from several places in the brain. There is a so-called knees Olympic reward pathway, which is a whole set of places in the brain or circuit design to get us, motivated, and craving, and in pursuit of things. And then, of course, there are areas of the brain that are involved in the movement that are linked up with those areas involved in motivation. That makes perfect sense. Why would you have a brain area involved in motivation if you can actually do something with that motivation, so the way that your brain is designed is when there's an increasing dopamine in the measle, limit for word pathway their signal, sent to an area of the brain called the striatum. Going to spend a little bit of time today in the striatum. It's got a Apartment in a partner eventual part, which means the lower part, and the dopamine sent to those areas places. Places us, use me into modes of action to pursue particular things. Sugar or Sweet Taste. I should say to be more specific have an incredibly potent ability to activate dopamine released within the US Olympic reward pathway. This has been shown over and over and over again in animal models and Inhumans. This is especially true. I should mention through the ingestion of sweet liquids. This becomes a very important point to us a little later on when we talked about the proliferation of sodas and sweet drinks. And dare. I Even Say Non sugar or diet sodas were going to get into that a little bit later that perhaps one of the most third rail Topics in nutrition. But when we ingest something sweet, the perception of that sweet taste increases dopamine in the measle, immigrant Ward Pathways, which then are conveyed to Pathways for motor behavior. And in general, Place Us in two modes of focused action toward getting more of whatever was sweet. And for those of you that are very disciplined, you can probably eat that piece. One piece of chocolate and be just fine. But if you understand the way that dopamine works, well, you'll realize is that when this dopamine Pathways triggered, it tends to create not the sensation where the perception of society of feeling like something is enough, but rather to produce the sensation of wanting more, as described in the episode that I hosted with my phenomenal. Colleague from Stanford School of Medicine. Dr. Anna Lemke. She's an expert on addiction and dopamine pathways. The dopamine circuits of the brain, have what we call a pleasure-pain balance and there I'm paraphrasing. What doctor on Olympic he has said and has written about in her beautiful book, dopamine Nation. If you haven't read that book, I highly recommend it whether or not you have issues with a dictionary, you know, people that do or you don't, it's an incredibly important read, especially if you're interested in understanding motivated, behaviors and ways to channel your behaviors and life toward healthy, motivated, behaviors, and make sure that you avoid some of the common pitfalls that people fall into nauseous addiction. But things, like over used, social media were wasting time in general. It's a phenomenal book. In that book and course within research articles. You will find evidence of the so-called pleasure-pain balance that exists within our dopamine circuits. Nobody has dopamine circuits that allow them to escape this pleasure-pain balance in the way. This works, is that any time that we engage in a behavior or just something that increases our levels of dopamine? There is a subsequent increase in the neural circuits that control our sense of frustration pain and lack. And you can actually noticed this phenomenon if Branson to somebody who really likes chocolate. Or you really like something else, pay attention to the way that you experience indulging in that thing. If you eat that piece of chocolate and you really focus on savoring. It's amazing taste, you'll notice that it provides. Some quenching of your desire for. What's a sweet stuff? Or chocolate, or both? But right, as you stop experiencing that right, is that chocolate intake? Tapers off as you swallow, it down your throat or you just pause for a second. After is, what you'll notice is that your brain and body actually Orient toward wanting more and that wanting of more, is really the action of the neural circuits that underlie pain and are pushing your dopamine levels back down. And when the circuits go awry, or I should say, when people fail to control themselves, within the context of that pleasure-pain balance, the typical behavior is to reach for yet. Another chocolate or two, then look for something that will quench that desire and get dopamine levels back up. Now the wait, Pleasure or pain circuits work is very diabolical. As it turns out that where you to take another piece of chocolate. Yes. Your dopamine levels, would go back up but not to the same extent that they did. The first bite of chocolate that you had. In fact, we can say that the longer it's been since you've indulged in something that you really enjoy, or would like the greater, the dopamine you will experience when you finally engaged in that behavior or indulge that thing and just that thing and the greater, the dopamine increase the greater, the subsequent action of those Payne circuits. So this put you on a very complicated seesaw. That's a very wobbly precarious state to be in which is not to say, you shouldn't have a piece of chocolate. It's just to say that the Sweet Taste of sweet things in particular things that we crave very much and we wait and wait and wait and then we allow ourselves to indulge. Those triggers changes in our neurochemistry. No neural circuits. That place us in a very vulnerable place, to either one more and more of that thing or to seek out other ways to fill that kind of emptiness that we feel or that Gap. Like or I would love more but I'm not going to allow myself more. Now again, I'm not saying that you shouldn't presume pleasurable things. I mean this molecule dopamine exist for a reason. It's the frankly because of its involvement in Sex and reproduction. It's the reason we're all here in the first place. Because last time I checked the only way any of us got here was one way or another sperm egg. And there was conception still believe, there are no exceptions to that and then I'm aware of anyway. That is a process where I should say, the events leading up to that process. Typically involve dopamine one way or another. There are exceptions to that too. But you get the idea. These dopamine pathways are not evil. They're not bad. But once you understand the way they work, you can leverage them to your advantage as opposed to them leveraging you to their advantage. Okay. So what do you ingest something sweet? You perceive that sweet taste and a cascading Sue's with in your brain. That makes you want more of the sweet thing. That's the conscious pathway for sugar perception for sweet perception. Now, there's the second pathway. The second pathway is What's called the post injective reinforcing properties of sugar, which is really just a fancy nerd. Speak way of saying their events that happened with yours within your stomach and below your conscious detection. That are also driving you to seek out sweet tasting, things independent of their tastes and foods that increase blood glucose. Independent of their taste in order to illustrate the immense power of the subconscious circuits for sugar seeking. I'd like to describe an experiment and this is just one of many of dozens or more experiments done in animal models and humans, which essentially illustrate the same thing. And as I described this experiment, I think you will come to understand the power of these circuits. I'll provide a link to this study in the caption first. Authors Freeman out of paper with Oceanfront ears and bioscience, but there have been others papers in Nature, Neuroscience papers and neurons how many many, many, many papers. If subjects are given the choice of drinking plain water or a sweet tasting fluid, their preference for the sweet tasting fluid, is much much higher. Sweet things taste better than plain water, at least for most people and certainly for animals. If for instance, you take an animal which completely lacks sweet receptors. And you can do this, even through some molecular genetic Tools in gymnastics in the laboratory. We called, he's knocked out. My frickin knock out a particular receptor for sweet taste. You can confirm that. There's no perception of sweet things or at least no preference for sweet things in those animals and humans their other pharmacological. So you can eliminate sweet receptors in the mouth and by doing that, you people will tell, you know, I can't taste anything sweet. It's just Thursday. You could give them a ice cream. You could give them a sucrose, she isn't able sugar and they wouldn't be able to perceive it as sweet. If you eliminate the perception of sweet taste in the mouth, and you offer people or laboratory animals water versus some sugar contain solution. They do you eliminate the preference for the, for the sugary solution, which tells us that the perception of sweet is important for the for the preference for sweet tasting. Drink, this is also true for sweet-tasting foods. I should mention, however, in both animal models and in humans after about 15 minutes. Subject start preferring the sugary water, even though they can't taste that. It is sweeter guy. Such a repeat that if you eliminate the ability to sense, sweet to perceive Sweetness in Foods, then you eliminate the preference for sweet beverages or sweet Foods. So that's not surprising. But if you wait about 15 minutes the preference for the sweet beverage of the sweet food comes back. Now. Doesn't mean that they can perceive the sweetness. In fact, the way these experiments are done is very clever. You offer people various cups of different things are different, food items and they just look at what they eat more of her, what they prefer to eat more of. So this experiment is so crucial. Because what it says is that the preference for sugar containing food is in part due to the sweetness of those foods, but in part due to something else. And this something else is what we call the Post injective effect, and as I mentioned before, it took about 15 minutes and you've actually experienced this Whether you realize it or not this phenomenon, a post ingestive, rewarding properties of sweet Foods. Meaning what happens in your body when you ingest something that increases your blood glucose free, much has no doubt controlled you from the inside below your awareness. This was happening to you, and you didn't realize it. Here's how it works. We all have neurons within our gut. These around have a name. They are called neuro pod, sells Dura. Pot sales were famously discovered by Professor doctor at Duke University, and these cells respond to among other things, to the presence of sugar with in the gut. So, when we ingest a sugary food or drink, or we ingest a food or drink, that simply contains photo sucrose glucose or some other form of sugar that later through metabolism will be converted into glucose. The neuro pod cells are able to register the presence of those sweet or glucose stimulating foods. And In response to that send electrical signals. Because electrical signals are the way neurons. Communicate up to the brain via the so-called, the vagus nerve, the vagus nerve, of course, being a nerve pathway famous for its role in relaxation. And that's kind of the the Assumption out there. That's always involved in relaxation. That's not the case. It's involved in a lot of things besides relaxation, but none the less. These neural pods sells send electrical signals through a particular Highway within the Vegas odds and ends on information to the nucleus of the solitary tract. Nucleus of the solitary tract is an area of the brain that we are going to talk about extensively today. It's very important for understanding sugar preference. These are Apostles also trigger activation of dopamine Pathways within the measle. Ended forward pathway. In other words. There are signals conveyed from the gut meaning stomach and intestines to the brain. Anytime. We just sweet foods, but it has nothing to do with our perception of them being sweet. Had everything to do with the fact that sweetness of foods is almost always correlated with an ability to increase blood glucose and the net effect of this is a parallel pathway by, which dopamine is increased further. Know the experiment that I described before of animals or humans ingesting something that contains sugar but not being able to perceive its sweetness. And yet after a. Of time. Still preferring that food or drink to non-sugar containing food or drinks, even though they can't distinguish their taste. It is dependent on these neural pods cells and related Pathways. What this means for you is that anytime you eat something, sweet? That substance is actually causing your gut your stomach in your intestine or to be more precise. To say that substance is food substance, is causing the neural pods cells in your stomach and intestines to send a parallel set of signals up to your brain saying, eat more of that or simply eat more eatmore. Eat morning. Preferably eat more sweet food. So we've all heard of hidden sugars. Meaning the sugars that manufacturers have put into Foods in disguise, them with other flavors. I talk about this in the episode on salt, using salt to mask, the taste of sweetness of that people, ingest more sugar. That is not an accident. That hidden sugars are often hidden with salt or with other flavors. It's done. So that people will meaning you or me will want to ingest more of a particular food. Independent of how sweet that food tastes. And in fact, some crackers for instance, chips, for instance, you might think. Oh, well, you know, chips, they're not sweet, their salt. And savory, and I guess I'll make sure I love salty Savory Foods including certain food. I love kettle. Chips for incense, out of try, not to walk by them in the grocery store. I usually have to eat one bag while I'm in the store. And then another later, the Savory Foods are often Laden with these hidden sugars that we can't register as sweetness, but trigger the neural pods cells which then further trigger dopamine, which make us want more of them. Now we may be able to resist eating more of them, but it makes us crave more food in general. Now, we will talk about ways to regulate this pathway. Pittsburgh intervene in this subconscious pathway, but for now, I'm hoping that just the understanding that we all have this pathway. This is hardwired into our body could potentially allow people to better understand. Why is it that their Cravings are so intense? That it's not necessarily just about the taste of that food. And when you consider this in concert with the fact that we have is dopamine, playing ping, pleasure balance, gives me that. I referred to earlier, you start to realize that there are multiple mechanism hardwired into us, that make it especially hard to not eat the sweet thing or to not eat the food that were craving. And indeed, that's the case. We have two major accelerators. It's like a car with two accelerators, and we will talk about the brakes. But two ways that really get us into Forward Motion toward pursuing, the consumption of sweet Foods. Now, if it doesn't always seem diabolical, now that sweet things that we perceive a sweet, make us want to eat more of those. Cuz of dopamine and then send us down this pain, pleasure pathway. I mentioned earlier and the fact that we have this subconscious circuit coming from the neural pods cells in our gut that are registering the presence of sugar glucose increasing Foods in our gut and sending those signals to the brain for yet. More dopamine pain, pleasure challenges. There's a third layer to this whole thing and then has to do with how sugar is metabolized in the brain or I should say how glucose is used without getting into too much detail. Some of the more beautiful studies of neuroimaging and evaluating which brain areas are active when we eat certain foods were done by dr. Dennis, Mall's Lab at Yale University and in some of her previous work, When she was elsewhere and of course, by other Laboratories to and they use in approach called positron emission tomography. And then others have used pets, scanning is it called positron emission? Tomography along with a tool called 2-deoxyglucose, 2-deoxyglucose is actually involved in the procedure of seeing which brain areas are active when people eat food or engage in other types of behaviors, but the way that 2-deoxyglucose, sometimes shortened to DG the way that it works is to block glucose uptake from neurons and instead bring along with it a marker that one can see through Imaging, another word for a tool for looking at what parts of the brain are active. When eating particular Foods actually prevents foods, such as sugar from allowing glucose to get into particular neurons. Now, that might seem like a bad situation. It's a well wait, you're trying to understand how sugar works in the brain. And then you block the ability for sugar glucose too fine to or be used by these neurons because of the thing that you're using for the experiment. Exactly. It's a huge problem, but turned out to be a huge problem that led to a great insight and the great inside is this the preference for sweet tasting foods and liquids is actually blocked by two deoxyglucose, what that means, experimental e. But also in terms of what it means for you and me and the real world is that there is yet a third parallel pathway, that's related to the use of blood sugar, the use of glucose by neurons. That further reinforces our desire to eat more sweet things and the preference for sweet foods can actually be eliminated through 2-deoxyglucose. Now, I am definitely don't want. People going out and consuming doxy glucose. This is a laboratory tool. It is not something. That you should be ingesting. So don't go look it up and try and get some. There might be other uses for, but that's not the point. The point is that it is the Sweet Taste of sugary Foods. It is the signals coming from your gut, from your digestive tract, to your brain. And it's the use of the metabolic consequences of sugary foods. That are acting is a three-prong, push on your desire to consume more sugary food. So this car and Allergy that use before where it's some weird car that has two accelerators and actually has three accelerators and sew with three accelerators. All pushing the system hard. We can say, wow, there must be something really special about this pathway indeed. There. Is this pathway of the quickest source of fuel for the brain and the rest of the nervous system is the preferred source of fuel for the brain and nervous system. And I realize, I say that all that, the Keeter needs. Those are probably going to actually ketones with a preferred Source, okay. I acknowledge that there are conditions under which you can bring your blood glucose, very low and their reasons to do that. Actually ketosis has been a terrifically successful treatment for a lot of forms of epilepsy in particular, pediatric, epilepsy many people do derive benefit from ketogenic diet. So I'm not knocking ketogenic diet. But if you were to look at what neurons normally prefer, meaning in a typical diet regimen, it would be glucose. And the fact that fructose is eventually converted to glucose. The fact that when we ingest sucrose, it's eventually converted into a fuel that neurons can use. That's very much in the glucose pathway. What you basically arrived at the fact that your nervous system is a glucose consuming machine, and you got at least three Pathways of which, I've described that are pushing on your brain consciously, and subconsciously, to get you to seek and consume more sugar. Now, that all sounds like a pretty depressing picture. At least, for those of you there, trying to reduce your sugar intake. And of course, we can all Sugar intake, by way of sheer will we can not have those who is at home? We can restrict ourselves from those. But there are some things that we all can and should do in order to regulate these Pathways such that we don't feel so controlled by them, but rather that we control their output. And of course, they are Austin. We are them. So this gets into all sorts of issues of Consciousness and Free Will that I certainly don't want to cover in this episode on the less. I think once you understand that these circuits exist, and you understand that their simple substitutions and modifications that one can make to their food intake that can work within these Pathways and even bypass. Some of these Pathways, you start to realize that you have a lot more control over sugar intake and sugar appetite. Then you previously, thought and how many of you have heard of the so-called glycemic index. The glycemic index is a measure of how quickly blood sugar Rises after ingesting particular Foods. And very broadly. Speaking, we can say that there are low glycemic index foods of less than 55, typically is the measurement or medium lycee, make index foods, which go from about fifty-five to sixty nine. And then so-called high-glycemic foods, which are above 70 related to glycemic load and many more features of the glycemic index. A couple of things to understand about how the glycemic index is measured. And then I'd like to just briefly talked about how the glycemic index can be leveraged to short-circuit, some of the neural circuit that would otherwise lead us to Crave and perhaps even in, jest sugary Foods. First of all, Measurements of glycemic, indices of food are typically made by having people in, just those whose in isolation. And in general, we can say that. Anytime we ingest fiber and or fat lipids along with a particular food. It will reduce the glycemic index of that particular food, either the absolute level of blood glucose that a particular food causes or the rate at which that elevation of blood glucose occurs. And this is why there's some seemingly paradoxical aspects to Sweet Stuff in terms of glycemic index. Princess ice cream has a lower glycemic index providers ice cream, then includes fat, which I hope it would cuz that's the good tasting. Ice cream. In my opinion, compared to something like, mangoes are table sugar. So The glycemic index is not something to hold. Holy in most cases because most people are not ingesting Foods in isolation. And there's actually a lot of argument as to whether or not the glycemic index is really as vital as some people claim. There's also the context in which you ingest particular Cruise, as I mentioned earlier, after I do hard training of any kind of meaning training, they ought to deplete glycogen too hard resistance training. I make it a point to adjust. Some very sweet. High-glycemic foods like a mango. I also enjoy some start just cuz I'm trying to replenish glycogen. Am also trying to spike my blood sugar a little bit because that can be advantageous in terms of certain strengthen hypertrophy protocols Etc. But most the time I'm avoiding these high-glycemic Foods in high sugar foods. I should point that out that. Why am I telling you about the glycemic index? Well, if we zoom out and take our perspective on all this discussion, about the glycemic index, through the lens of the nervous system, and we remind ourselves that neurons prefer glucose for energy and then all sweet things. Things that we perceive a sweet but also sweet things that are ingested and registered by those neural pods cells in our gut trigger, the release of dopamine and Trigger these neural circuits to make us want to eat more of these Foods. We start to realize is that a sharp rise in blood glucose or a very high degree of elevation in blood glucose is going to be a much more potent signal then will a more moderate rise in blood glucose or a slower rise in blood glucose. So we think about the analogy of three accelerators, meaning three parallel. Neural circuits are essentially there to get us to seek out and consume more sweet tasting and sugary foods. Will then the glycemic index is sort of our measurement of how hard we are pushing down on how fast we are pushing down on those three accelerators. And so those of you that are trying to reduce sugar intake and you want to do that through an understanding of how these neural circuits work and you want to Short circuit. Some of the dopamine released its caused by ingesting sugary Foods. It can be advantageous to ingest sweet Foods either alone or in combination with foods that reduce glycemic index or reduce glycemic load. So that might mean making different food choices. So paying attention to sweet tasting foods that can satisfy sugar Cravings, but do not have a steep, or I should say, do not cause a steep rise in blood sugar or it could mean consuming other Foods along with sweet Foods in order to reduce the glycemic index and thereby slow or blunt. The release of dopamine, you might think well, why would I want to do that? I want the maximum dopamine output in response to a given sweet food. I don't just want the, you know, level 10. I want the level 100 output of dopamine, but you really don't because of the pleasure-pain balance that dopamine causes and effect. We consider some of the non-food substance. That really push hard on these dopamine Pathways. We can come up with a somewhat Sinister, but none the less appropriate analogy. The drug cocaine causes very, robust potent increases in dopamine, within the brain and typically causes people to want to ingest more cocaine because of those sharp increases in dopamine, but within the category of the drug cocaine, their various modes of ingestion. Some people inhale it, some people will injected intravenously. Some people will smoke it and those different forms of taking cocaine actually impact the dopamine circuits differently. And it turns out that crack cocaine, the smokable form of cocaine Rock increases dopamine to a very high degree, but also very, very quickly, and it is the sharp rise in dopamine overtime. Not so much. The absolute level of dopamine. That makes crack cocaine. So absolutely addictive. Sometimes you'll hear sugar is like, crack well, and that's getting a little extreme because I don't think the measurements have been done in the same experiment. I think it's reasonable to think that the absolute level of dopamine. Caused by ingesting. Sugar least for most people is not going to be as high as the absolute level of dopamine caused by smoking. Crack course, it goes without saying, please. Don't do cocaine in any form, by the way. It is appropriate to say that the rate of dopamine increase. Over time has a profound effect on how people will and if people will go on to want to pursue more of what caused the increase in dopamine. So what a basically saying is if you're going to ingest sweet Foods in order to satisfy a Sweet Craving. Adjusting sweet foods for which the glycemic index is lower order in which you've adjusted those glycemic index food, through the ingestion of fiber or maybe fat might be beneficial. So is this justification for putting peanut butter on that piece of chocolate or for having a bowl of ice cream along with the mango that you're craving in some sense? Yes. However, there's also the issue of how sweet and how delicious something tastes highly palatable food. Absolutely delicious food trigger that one neural circuit that one accelerator that were talking about in terms of our analogy of three accelerators and the more delicious something tastes within our mouths, the further increase in dopamine. So if you really wanted to adjust your sugar cravings and you really still want to in just some sugary food, you probably better off combining fiber with that sugary or sweet food. Why do realize that it's somewhat unusual and you probably get some strange stairs. If you decided to consume broccoli, for instance, along with your chocolate or with another dessert, that would otherwise cause a steep increase in blood sugar and has a high glycemic index, but none, the less. If your goal is to blunt your sugar, craving, what you really need to do is blunt that, dopamine increase. So what we're really talking about here is trying to reduce the dopamine signal that is the consequence of ingesting sweet foods, and we're talking about doing that through these different parallel. Pathways. Not just by preventing sweet taste, but also by preventing the post Injustice effects of sweet Foods. And of course, the backdrop to all of this is that most of us again most of us, not all of us, should probably be ingesting. Few are refined sugars. Certainly there are exceptions to that, but I think the bulk of data point to the fact that ingesting these highly palatable certainly. Highly palatable, highly processed foods are foods that contain a lot of high fructose corn syrup, can be really deleterious to our health, especially in kids and I'm not going to fight off a bunch of Statistics. You've all heard them before that, you know, for hundreds of years. We ingested, you know, the equivalent of a few cops are pounds of sugar per year. And you know, now people are just in hundreds of pounds of sugar per year. The major culprit always seems to be sugary drinks, meaning soft drinks and I think indeed that's the case. I do want to point out the incredible work of dr. Robert lustig, who is a pediatric endocrinologist at the University of California. San Francisco was really early in the game of avoiding the dangers of so-called hidden sugars. And highly processed foods are other people, of course, not talking about this. His laboratory has done important work showing for instance, that if high fructose corn syrup, or even just fructose is replaced with glucose, even if the same number of calories is ingested, that there are important, many significant reductions in type 2 diabetes. Some of the metabolic syndrome is associated with high fructose, corn syrup and on and on and on. And of course, there are other culprits in type 2 diabetes. There are other factors that are going to lead to obesity, but I think the work from lustig and others has really Illustrated that we should all be trying to reduce our intake of Highly refined sugars and high-fructose corn syrup and certainly trying to reduce our intake of Very sugary drinks, not just soft drinks, but also fruit juices that contain a lot of sugar. Now, even for people that are of healthy weight and who don't have metabolic syndrome. There may be an additional reason to not want to ingest very sweet foods, and highly refined sugars. And this has to do with a new and emerging area of nutrition neuroscience. And I want to point out that these are new data, right? So it's not a lock. The double-blind placebo-controlled studies. In large. Populations have not been finished. So I want to, I want to make sure that that's clear, but I also want to make clear what some of the really exciting gate. It coming from Dana small slab at Yale. And from other Laboratories are showing. And this has to do with what's called conditioned taste preference. Using a kind of pavlovian Paradigm. What they do is they have people and He studies were done in people and just multi dextrin, which increases blood glucose doesn't have much flavor, but even if it Does have a little bit of subtle flavor. The malta. Dextrin is cloaked by some other flavor, and by cloaking it with that other flavor or pairing it with that other flavor. What they find is that overtime, because I'm alter dextran increases blood glucose and they are adjusting a particular flavor along with that multiple dextrin. They can, then remove them all to dextrin and the flavor will induce an increase in insulin. The interest in insulin, of course, is the consequence of the fact that anytime there's a rise in blood glucose provided. The person isn't diabetic. There's a parallel increase in insulin. This is very interesting because what it says is. Well, at a first pass, it says that we are very pavlovian in terms of our physiological, responses to foods and particular flavors. Come to be associated with particular patterns of blood glucose increase, and hence, patterns of insulin increase, because of course, insulin manages glucose in the blood stream. Earlier. This also has implications for understanding things, like artificial sweeteners and here I want to highlight that. This is still very controversial work and needs more data button unless I like to share it with you for consideration. The small laboratory is done studies in humans with an adult and children showing that if the flavor of artificial sweeteners is paired with multi dextrin and in the multi, dextrin is removed that the artificial sweetener tastes itself. Can subsequently increase insulin in the bloodstream. In other words, taking something that increases blood sugar attaching a flavor experience to that having children or adults ingest that thing Allows the nervous system to associate that flavor with that increasing blood glucose, but then you can remove the glucose increasing substance and the flavor alone will increase insulin because insulin typically follows blood glucose. So this is a conditioning affect. Now, the reason the estate or controversial as several fold, first of all, the landscape around the discussion around, artificial sweeteners, is definitely what I would call a barbed wire topic and I want to preface what I'm about to say next. By saying, I actually ingest artificial sweeteners. I will have the occasional diet soda, not every day, maybe once or twice a month. I don't particularly like the taste. But I'll do it just cuz it's around and I want some caffeine and I like the carbonation. I want to plane or something. I do ingest. Plant-based non-caloric sweeteners to my knowledge. There, have not been high quality studies of plant-based non-caloric sweeteners in the context that I'm referring to hear. Okay, none the less the study showed that particular flavors can be conditioned to cause an insulin increase and the flavor associated with certain artificial sweeteners. Is included in that category of flavors that can induce insulin even in the absence of something that can increase. Blood glucose. Now, simple, take away from these studies would be the following and this is actually one interpretation. That Dana small has offered to her data, but she offers other interpretations as well, that if people are going to ingest artificial sweeteners, and they do that along with foods that very sharply increase blood glucose. Then there is the potential highlight, the potential for those same artificial sweeteners, to increase insulin, even in the absence of food. In other words, let's just draw the scenario out in the real world. You're having a diet soda along with a cheeseburger and fries. You do that everyday for lunch. OK, is somewhat extreme example. The natural world example you that everyday for lunch and then you just have a diet soda alone. The extreme interpretation of the data they've collected says, well that diet soda alone will increase insulin. Even though there's no increase in blood glucose because you haven't adjusted to do that because you condition that taste of artificial, sweetener to the experience of a rise in glucose and hence insolent. Now, the counter argument to this would be well, that's a very unusual situation, multi, dextrin causes big increases in blood glucose. So, that's not really a fair experiment or it's not our natural world experiment. I think that's a decent assessment. Although I will point out that one of the reasons why this study is so controversial or why these days are so controversial. Is that the experiment actually had to be stopped and visited experiment in children. Had to be stopped because the changes in insulin that were observed early in the study were so detrimental that the institutional review board quite appropriately said, we can't do this to these kids. They're experiencing these odd shifts in insula. That are not healthy for them when they're just ingesting artificial sweeteners in the absence of these glucose increasing food. So once again, I doing ingest artificial sweeteners, I'm not saying that they are dangerous. Do not think that they are not dangerous. I'm saying that, you have to decide for yourself and previous episodes. I've highlighted, the artificial sweeteners have been shown in studies of animals that when given in very high doses, sucralose in particular, there can be fairly robust disruption to the gut microbiome, which is vital for immune health and brain health etcetera etcetera, but that's far our knowledge of how artificial sweeteners negatively impact or positively impacts. I should say the microbiome and other deleterious effects. The body has mainly been explored in animal studies. Again, the work by Dana small has been done in humans. There's a lot of work by others in animal model. I bring it up today to illustrate the following point. Normally, we have a pathway that we don't have to condition at all. It's there from birth. We're by ingestion of sweet Foods causes increases and dopamine, and there are parallel Pathways by which neurons in our gut and elsewhere in our body trigger further increases in dopamine. So, there's no need for a conditioned response or to become pavlovian about this, right? You're hardwired to want to eat sweet things by at least 2 and probably three parallel Pathways. Now the work from Dance Moms loud and others that have illustrate this condition flavor preference. I think beautifully show that any flavor that's associated with a glucose Spike or a long sustained. Increase in glucose can also be condition. In other words, the circuits for dopamine that reinforce the desire to eat particular. Things is not unique to the sugar pathway. And this is one of the reasons I believe why ingestion of sweet Foods doesn't just lead us to want it. Eat more sweet food. I think that is absolutely clear based on animal data and on human data. Think the robots. It's actually the stuff of textbooks now. But in addition ingesting, sweet food and or foods that raise blood glucose, but that we don't perceive as sweet. So for instance foods with hidden sugars should Rosetta been masked by salty or spicy taste. Increases our desire for glucose, elevating food and food. Generally, I think that's the only logical interpretation of the data that I can arrive at. So for people that struggle with regulating their appetite with regulating their sugar appetite, I think the understanding of condition flavor preference while a little bit complicated. Ought to be useful and trying to navigate reducing sugar cravings and sugar intake is segue into tools to control sugar intake as a means to both regulate sugar intake itself, as well as food intake overall and steer us towards healthier choices and like to talk about some of the special populations out there that might want to be especially wary of having a dysregulated. Sugar appetite system and the group, I'm referring to specifically for those with attention deficit, hyperactivity disorder or I should say and or people who have issues with focus and attention generally. And I think more and more nowadays. I'm hearing that people are having a hard time. Focusing. This probably has something to do with our interactions. With electronic devices is always say if a picture is worth a thousand words, the movie is worth a million pictures and the fact that we can access. So many movies in just by scrolling with our thumb, is something that the nervous system. It's just never contented with before in human history, him know that, and it's not that it can't deal with it. The question is, what's the trade-off and what are the consequences of that? So, Attention. Inability to focus is obviously key to success in school Success in relationship, success in the workplace and success in life. We could probably even go so far. As to say, one's ability to succeed in anything is proportional to one's ability to focus and then deliberately defocus when the time comes to the focusrite cuz we all need rest and we need to disengage him and re-engage. if you look at the sum total of the Meta-analyses in the clinical data on ADHD and nutrition. You arrive at a pretty clear answer which is that Sugar consumption in particular. Highly refined sugars is just not good for people with ADHD or potential issues. Now they say that I also want you to recall the earlier study that I referred to wear by the tuning of neurons in the brain is highly dependent on glucose. So this doesn't mean consuming no glucose is going to be a good idea, doesn't mean that the ketogenic diet is necessarily the best diet for ADHD. Although there are some people pursuing that flooring that and it will do yet another episode of ADHD at some point that goes a little deeper into that because there's some new data I did do a very long and fairly extensive episode and ADHD. You're welcome to it. Look that up. If you like in our, I got a excuse me, in our archive at huberman. Lab.com, Do timestamps. So, you know because a number of people said, oh, you know, it said episode on 88th Cheney made two and a half hours long. Yes, we did because we wanted to be as comprehensive as we could at the time but it is time. Stamped. You can just jump to the particular topics of interest in their short little cassettes there. Now, if you'd like to know upon what I'm basing, the statement that Sugar consumption and highly refined sugar consumption as potentially bad for ADHD Basin this. Mainly on the conclusions of a of a really nice paper that the title of the paper is sugar, consumption of sugar-sweetened Beverages and attention deficit, hyperactivity disorder, a systematic review and meta-analysis. And this is the paper will put a link to this in the, in the caption. This was published in complementary, Therapies in medicine, which is a typical journal in some sense. But I really like this meta-analysis, the, the sum total of of this meta-analysis is really that. When the kids get beyond for Sugary drinks per week, do for sodas of typical 12. Oz soda. I want to get past four 12 oz sugary sodas. They didn't know, look at artificially-sweetened. So that's when you start to see a shift towards more negative outcomes, more symptoms of existing ADHD. Now where the controversy comes in as whether or not sugar consumption can actually Trigger or cause ADHD and I don't think we can conclude that at all at this time and this review, if you decide to check it out to review / better now, so I should say if you decide to check it out, goes into some of the new on surround that what's also interesting in terms of ADHD and sugar intake and probably has relevance to all of us is that they also covered some of the interesting data showing that supplementation with omega-3. Fatty acids can actually be beneficial for people in particular kids with ADHD. I talked before about the utility of Omega-3s. That's been shown in various studies that have compared omega-3 fatty acid intake, to say, prescription antidepressants like ssris. Like Prozac to The Loft in similar fluoxetine. And the results of those studies are pretty clear. At least, to me that provided it one guess at least 1 G of EPA essential fatty acids. So it's not just getting one gram per day. But one or more grams per day of the EPA form of essential, fatty acid, can rival, some prescription antidepressants, and, or decrease the amount of antidepressants that's required to take, which for a lot of people can be a very useful thing because of the side effect profile of any of those antidepressants, of course, talk to your psychiatrist, talk to your doctor about the Omega, threes are no doubt powerful. And then, of course, there's a whole story about Omega threes, in heart health, and of course, like anything else, there's some controversy around a mega 3 is but I think the date are clear enough to me around mood and cardiovascular health. It certainly, I personally ingest them. As always. I always say any time you're going to a door. Do anything from your nutrition supplementation exercise or other wise your lifestyle definitely consult with a board-certified physician? I don't just say that. Protect me. I say that to protect you you are responsible for your health. So I'll make it three. Supplementation has been shown to be beneficial for ADHD. Why am I talking about this in the context of an episode on sugar and the nervous system? Well, do you remember those neural pods cells are cells in your gut that respond to sugar and send signals up to the brain to cause a release of dopamine? Well turns out that robot cells also respond to amino acids and 2 fatty acids in particular essential fatty acids. So these cells that we call neuro pot cells. Have 3, jobs one is to detect levels of sugar in the gut. The other is to detect levels of amino acids and to detect levels of particular essential fatty acids and communicate that information to the brain. And I should point out the way they communicate that information. They're not actually say Hey, there's a me. No asset to your hey there. Sugar hero. Hey, there's essential fatty acids, because the language of these cells is somewhat generic. It's just a firing of electrical potentials. But that's the key point is generic and all three or any of those three sugar essential at fatty acids or amino acids will trigger these neurons to signal to the brain to increase dopamine. And it is not coincidental that a mega 3 fatty acid, supplementation can help ameliorate some of the symptoms of ADHD. By way of presumably increasing, dopamine in this narrow pod to dopamine pathway that we talked about earlier. The whole thing has a very nice logical structure to it and points to yet. Again, the immense value of bringing the proper amounts, maybe even supplementing the proper amount of omega-3, fatty acid, and the proper amount of amino acid into the gut, as a way to supplant some of the stimulation of these Pathways, that would otherwise be caused by sugar. There's actually a version of this where one could say, if you want to reduce sugar Cravings, you might consider increasing certain forms of amino acid intake or certain forms of fatty acid intake. So, what are some ways that we can reduce our sugar cravings and ideally ways that we can do that, that also benefit us in other ways. But then Tricia Lee in from the Neuroscience standpoint. Well, these narrow part cells that respond to and Signal the brain. When we adjust sugar, as I mentioned, also respond to amino acids, are essential fatty acids. We already talked about the essential fatty acids. I make it a particular point to ingest anywhere from 1 to 3. Gram. That's G of eps, Central fatty acid per day. I made it a point to do that with you just of high-quality Omega-3s for me the simplest way to do that. And I think for most people, the lowest cost way to do that, is to use some liquid form of fish oil or some capsule form of fish oil. You really do have to see how much? Essential fatty acids in the form of EPA is in those. If you try to do that, only through capsules. It can get kind of expensive depending on which particular brands. Use some have more EPA. Some less. You can, of course, also, do this to foods, you can do this with non-fish sources through things like LG and there's some other forms, you can look it up online. Now, you know plant-based sources of epa's, you do the splits with high-quality fish oil in any case, That does seem at least based on a modest amount, but none, the less solid literature to reduce sugar Cravings, somewhat, but that could easily be by mirror replacement of calories, right? So we don't know yet based on human studies, whether or not the ingestion of those epa's is specifically activating the neural cells which specifically activate and bypasses the need for our, the craving, for sugar. We don't know that yet, but but logically holds up to assume that the fact that these are iPod sailed. And I should say other neurons within the gut respond, very robustly to the presence of particular amino acids, is also a potential leaver by which one can reduce sugar cravings and there's an interesting literature around the amino acid supplement, as it relates to Sugar, cravings and certainly, as it relates to other aspects of the gut in particularly. He got the use of supplemental glutamine to try and treat. Leaky got is not a new phenomenon. There are other approaches to, of course, but there are many people who are experimenting with supplementing with glutamine, several grams per day off. And even, you know, 5 G distributed through three or four different servings throughout the day, as a way to blunt their sugar craving. Now, there has not yet been a large-scale clinical trial, using glutamine to reduce sugar Cravings, but the results of the few studies that I looked at as well as my understanding of the logic of these neural circuits, including the robot sales, brings us to a conclusion that it makes sense. Why if there's a population of neurons within our gut that responds very robust lead to the presence of sugar fatty acid or amino acids that the intake, a particular amino acids would allow the dopamine Pathways. That might otherwise be triggered by sugar to be triggered by something like gluten. Which has very few or no calories in a fact, having talked about this previously, a number of people that I know went out and try this. Now. This is, of course, is what I call anecdata. It's not a, it's not a quality review study. This is anecdata. Many of them have reported back that they actually feel as if their sugar Cravings are reduced. I know some people who actually take glutamine and mix it with full-fat cream and take it, like a shot of full-fat cream or something. Absolutely delicious. By the way, gluten is a little chalky. So it's not that great tasting too. And just with sugar, I should mention. If you do try and take this approach of ingesting glutamine to reduce sugar Cravings, you want to increase the amount of glutamine that you take somewhat gradually, it can create some gastric distress. If you just. You know, I would certainly wouldn't take a big tablespoon of it throwing him water and chug it down three times a day. Some of you with three. Hearty stomach can probably tolerate that if you're like me, you know, my Bulldog, which important passed away. But Costello, I always imagined that if ever we did an autopsy on him. He died like a license plate in like a Even being in his gut cuz he might, he could ingest anything with no issues. But of course, many people have kind of sensitive got. So if you're going to try taking glutamine as a means, to reduce sugar Cravings, just know that the studies are still ongoing. Some people have Chief benefit, please also realize that there's an entire literature devoted to the potential hazards of increasing glutamine. If you have a pre-existing cancer, so if you have cancer your cancer-prone, I I would really discourage you from the suppression. In any case, as always, talk to your doctor. The logic nonetheless. Is there why increasing amino acid intake of fatty acid, intake might decrease sugar craving there? Other ways to reduce sugar cravings and they're certainly ways to reduce the sharp rise in blood glucose that can occur. When we ingest sugary sweet Foods or even just an abundance of carbohydrate foods and their huge number of these things. I'm going to sort of layer up through the ones that you might find in your cupboard at the The store and then get into some of the more extravagant, or I should say. I'm esoteric one many of which however can be quite potent. The first of which is simple, lemon juice, Sprite or lime juice. There was an old lore. And actually, some papers pointing to the idea that the ingestion of vinegar white vinegar or what, or wine vinegar could somehow blunt blood glucose after the ingestion of sugary Foods or the ingestion of a lot of carbohydrate Foods or even just a big meal, actually Tim Ferriss, the great Tim Ferriss cuz I do have great respect for the fact that you seem to be about 10 years ahead of everything, both in terms of nutrition and still learning things of that sort. Many of the things that you predicted in his books before our body and the for our Chef actually turned out to be true based on scientific data, some of which only exists in the animal models, but now also some predictions that that played out to be true in both the animal moles. And they So I think that Tim certainly deserves a tip for the fact that he experimented with these methods in and reported his experiences with those methods and that. Now some of the many of them have been validated by what I perceive to be quality science. He talked about the fact that at least in his experiments on himself. The ingestion of vinegar did not seem too blunt, blood glucose and he was using continuous glucose monitor. Incidentally. Another example of where Ferris was early to the to the game and the rest of us are kind of just in his wake. He talked about the use of a blood glucose monitors. Those I think at the time were implanted below the skin nowadays, there are less invasive. Blood glucose monitors levels and so forth, and either, I should be coming, pretty popular. I've worn one of these before they actually pretty informative. I learned princess that when I go in the sauna that I experienced a sharp rise in blood glucose and that makes sense because of the dehydration associated, with, being in the sun, a lot of stuff. Sing the concentration of sugar in the bloodstream goes up there, some other things at certain foods, affect my blood glucose, one way or another. It's interesting and fun experiment that some of you might be interested in doing as well. Regardless, there are now data pointing to the fact that lemon juice and lime juice, a couple tablespoons are so if ingested before or even during or even after consumption of sugary Foods or I should say foods, that sharply increased blood glucose or large carbohydrate meals. Can actually blunt the blood glucose response and I did see that when I did my own experiment, on myself, with continuous glucose monitor, it's kind of fun to do this experience experiments. I prefer to do those experiments by eating somewhat larger, meals of things that didn't contain a lot of sugar. I saw some big increases blood glucose in certain instances, and then I would just some lemon juice for lime juice to believe mixed in with water. And sure enough you could see a blunting of the blood glucose response. And of course, this was real time continuous. Blood glucose monitoring. So for those of you that are interested in wanting your blood sugar response, certain foods, that's a simple low-cost way to do that. If you want to explore, it will say, if you are fasting and you already have low blood glucose, and you ingest lemon juice or I should say, some lemon juice and water lime juice and water. Be careful because you can actually become hypoglycemic right? For the very same reason that these, that lemon juice and lime juice can blunt blood glucose. When your blood glucose levels are moderate to high. You can also reduce blood glucose levels even further when blood glucose levels are low. Now that's lemon juice and lime juice there, but we can't say that has to do with acidic than is generally and just as a side point of you probably seen the store so-called adjusted pH Waters were foods and drinks that are supposed to adjust, your pH, hate to break it to you. But your pH is very tightly regulated throughout your brain and body. You do not want this to change. It is entirely possible, at least in any safe way that you would become quite a bit more alkaline by ingesting an alkaline water or something like that. It is true that you're the pH or alkalinity in acidity varies in different compartments in your body. That's important. Unless you are hemorrhaging or vomiting or something badly, wrong with you health-wise, and you're in a really dire circumstance. You don't want big ships in your body, pH in your body, has all sorts of ways of buffering against. Changes in PH. So, I encourage you not to fall on the floor to hop on the bandwagon of adjusting pH and becoming less acidic, and that kind of thing, when you adjust lemon juice for lime juice, the mechanism, by which a blood blood glucose is probably true. Probably through the post ingestive effects of glucose in the gut, meaning the way and which sugars are interacting with Neurontin, other components of your gut, circuitry impact things, like gastric emptying, time to impact things like the firing of those narrow pot. Sales Center signaling to the brain, but almost certainly it has something to do also with the perception of sour taste on the tongue. We didn't go into this too much today, but You'll first don't just have sweet taste receptors in your mouth. You also have bitter taste receptors. You have a salty, taste receptors. You have sour taste receptors in your mouth. And on your and of course that means your tongue and palate. And those are interacting if you ingest a substance that is just sweet or mostly sweet. That causes a certain set of effects on your blood glucose. But also your brain dopamine and the other neural circuits of your brain. If you also and just something that's our like lemon juice for lime juice, it adjust the output of those neural circuits in your brain. So again, we have a situation. We have to parallel Pathways one that supposed ingestive coming from phenomenon within our gut neurons, but also things like gastric, emptying time that clearance and the transfer of Food and the conversion of food into protein in nutrients and the circulation of glucose in your bloodstream and how it gets into the brain. But also simply by ingesting something. Sour your change in the way that sweet things, impact your brain. And so I think it stands to reason that the lemon juice lime juice affect is not going to be magic. It's going to have everything to do with the way that ingesting sour foods can adjust the taste scuse me, can adjust the neural response to taste of sweet foods. And in fact, we know, based on the beautiful work of Charles Tucker at Columbia Medical School, that that's exactly what happens. They even measure the, the activity of neurons at various locations in the so-called taste Pathways of the brain. And they found it when particular tastes like just sweet or just bitter or just sour if certain ensembles of neurons to fire in particular sequences when sweet and sour Co ingested, when bitter and sour. Congested you get distinct ensembles, meaning, distinct patterns of activity of those Neurontin. Of course, distinct, patterns of Downstream activity within the brain and body. While it is still somewhat mysterious as to how exactly things like lemon juice and lime juice can reduce our blood glucose spikes. When we ingest those with sweet Foods or carbohydrate Laden Foods or with big meals, you can use it as a tool with the understanding that there's a grounding in the biology of the way these circuits work. Now, some of you have probably heard that cinnamon can be a useful tool for controlling blood sugar and indeed that's the case. It's very clear that cinnamon can adjust the rate of glucose entry into the bloodstream possibly by changing the rate of gastric emptying. It might slow the rate of gastric emptying and thereby also reduce the glycemic index of particular food. So I suppose if I were going to eat a mango and I hadn't just done a bunch of hard training on my sprinkle some cinnamon on it here and I always enjoy going to come in. New ideas of ways that I can eat foods during these podcast in any event. There's some debate out there. If you look online as to whether not Saigon Cinnamon, cassia cinnamon cinnamon, scuse me or Ceylon cinnamon is best for purposes of wanting blood glucose spikes, but I think the least by my read of of the data. And from what I found, it doesn't really matter provided. It's real cinnamon and you have to actually looking and make sure that it's real cinnamon because a lot of cinnamon that you buy is not real. I do want to provide a cautionary, note about cinnamon. However, cinnamon contain something called Coumadin, which can be toxic at high levels. So you don't want him just more than about a teaspoon, maybe a teaspoon and a half of cinnamon for day. Because you'll start to exceed the Threshold at which cinnamon could start to be problematic. But certainly if you're going to have a big meal or a meal that has a lot of sugar in it, for a lot of carbohydrate Laden food and you don't want an increase in blood glucose. You could Put cinnamon in a beverage you can put cinnamon on food in order to Blount that blood glucose increase, reduce the glycemic index. By way, of reducing, gastric emptying time. Again, that one and a half teaspoons per day, cuz you really don't want to start dealing with any of the toxicity of related to Coumadin. So we talked about lemon juice and lime juice, and cinnamon. These are kind of commonplace in mini kitchens. Then we'll course. We can Venture into the more esoteric or I would say the more advanced tools for adjusting sugar intake and the one that comes to mind is, of course, berberine berberine is a derivative of tree bark and is a very very potent substance for reducing blood. Glucose metformin side, which are prescription drugs, specifically used to reduce blood glucose. So using berberine is a serious stab. You should absolutely talk to your doctor about it. I know of a number of people that use it to lower blood glucose. When they eat, really large meals. I know the number of people, they're using it to get to some of the other effects of metformin. That people have discussed things like activating or tapping into the so-called ampk. Pathway reducing mtor. These are people that are aiming their activities at increasing, longevity and somewhat, controversial approach still, but I know many people are doing it. It is true. That if you ingest berberine, your blood glucose will plummet. And I point that out because I've actually tried it before, it gave me brutal headaches, and I felt really dizzy and I felt like I couldn't see straight and actually, I could see straight. Why did it do that? Well, it made me hypoglycemic and actually drove my blood glucose down too far. And the reason I did that is that I took berberine on an empty stomach. I know some people can tolerate it. I would say be very cautious about ingesting berberine on an empty stomach or if you are in a low carbohydrate diet, unless you really know what you're doing and you have a medical professional to kind of guide you through that. If I take berberine along with a very large meal, that include a lot of carbohydrates and I can recall the days in which Costello and I would need a couple of pizzas and then we might get ice cream that kind of thing. Then I felt perfectly fine on, even up, to 750 milligrams are in a gram of berberine. It has a kind of unique property of making you feel not overwhelmed by the amount of blood glucose, increase that you're experiencing from eating a big meal. I don't quite know how else to describe it. It's almost as if you can keep eating and eating and eating and of course, you have to protect your gastric the volume, right? I mean, you only have so much space in your stomach to digest food. I wasn't using it to gorge on food. I just heard about it. I was interested in experimenting with you. I don't have any chronic blood sugar issues. But again when I took it on an empty stomach, may be hypoglycemic with on a low carbohydrate intake hypoglycemic, not a good experience and again and experience I think to avoid but provided there's a lot of glue. In your bloodstream, and certainly if you are of the experimental type or you're trying to regulate blood glucose berberine might be a good option. But again, talk to your doctor. It does have some other interesting facts in terms of lowering total cholesterol, that our research supported producing insulin a little bit, but that's not surprising. If you reduce blood glucose, you're going to reduce insulin because, of course, insulin manages blood glucose in the blood stream. So I would Place berberine and of course, metformin in Glipizide, Collide in the kind of the heavy-hitting potent tool to regulate regulating blood glucose. Now, this is an episode not about sugar per se but sugar viewed through the lens of the nervous system. In what's interesting about berberine is that some of the effects are, of course, on gastric emptying or buffering blood glucose within the bloodstream. Etc. But there appears to also be some neural effects of having chronically low glucose or blunting blood glucose through things like berberine. And some of those neural faxed include long-standing changes in the hormonal Cascades that are the consequence of having low blood sugar and thereby changes in the neural circuits that manage blood glucose. Over all the simple way of saying, this is that by maintaining low to moderate blood glucose, either by not ingesting heavily carbohydrate Laden Foods. So here, I'm speaking to the low-carbon of the ketogenic types or by blunting blood glucose through things like metformin or berberine. Even if ingesting carbohydrates over time. It seems that there's a adjustment. What we call a homeostatic, regulation of the neural circuits that control things like sugar craving. And indeed, some people report feeling fewer sugar Cravings over time. Now, I didn't you. Super Brain for very long. Of time. I've never used metformin. I have experience to somewhat odd, but welcome phenomenon of, with each Progressive year of my life. I have fewer and fewer sugar Cravings. Why that is? I don't know. I suspect it might have something to do with my sleep and I'll talk about that in a few minutes. But if you're going to explore berberine or metformin or otherwise in addition to working with a doctor, I think you should understand why you're doing it, right? I think that many of the effects can be quite potent. They can happen in both the immediate term in terms of regulating blood glucose that can send you a hypoglycemic. If you aren't careful. They can also cause long-standing changes to the neural circuitry that regulates blood sugar over time. Some of which might be welcomed changes, right? Reduce sugar cravings. And if you are really, really serious about modulating blood, glucose through things, like berberine, the typical dose range again, is anywhere from half a gram to 1.5 G daily. That's the typical dosage has that have been exposed. And there's some other substances like sodium cap rate which are known to augment the effects of berberine via that ampk Pathways. They basically can increase the ability for bird brain to have its glucose-lowering actions. But that of course is getting into the really potent without call Sharp blade tools for controlling blood glucose. And listen, anytime you're dealing with blood glucose. You are dealing with the brains preferred source of fuel. And anytime we're dealing with the brains preferred source of fuel. You have to be, especially cautious about depriving the brain of what it needs. So whether or not you're low carb, high carb, keto, vegan carnivore, these substances, like, berberine are very, very potent and you need to take them. Seriously, there is yet another tool for controlling sugar cravings. And the neural circuits that regulate sugar craving, and it's Downstream consequences. And this tool is what I would call a high performance tool, but it's one that you probably didn't say Packed enough sleep. I've done extensive episodes about sleeping. We actually have an episode called master your sleep. You can find that episode easily at your room in live.com., It's available military formats, YouTube Apple Spotify etcetera and provides a lot of tools and on social media, provide a lot of tools often. We have a newsletter the brought tools and how to maximize sleep. What is the role of sleep in Sugar metabolism, sugar, hunger, and the way that the brain regulates those things? Well, there's a really exciting study that came out just last year. The study was published in the journal cell reports oppressed. You're an excellent journal. And the reason I love the study so much is involved having people. So yes, this was done in humans, sleep in the laboratory. That's Not Unusual. There's asleep out of Stamford. There's sleep Labs elsewhere. But what they did was, they actually measured from the breadth of these people and they extracted from their breath. The metabolites that would allow them to understand what sorts of metabolism was occurring in these people's bodies, a different phases of sleep, and this is really remarkable State. They actually did this every 10 seconds throughout the entire night. So, in little tiny 10 separate, beings meaning of very high resolution, they could have a legate. What is the metabolism in the brain and body that people experience as they go from REM sleep, rapid eye movement, sleep to slow, wave sleep, and so on. And I'll go deeper into the study again in the future because it's so interesting. And I think so important. But what they discovered was that each stage of sleep, was associated with a very particular signature pattern of metabolism and particular, phases of sleeve are associated with sugar metabolism or more with fat metabolism or more with other aspects of metabolism. And the reason why I think the study is important to discuss in the context of today's discussion about sugar in the brain, is that many people have experienced. The effects of disrupted sleep on their appetite. And in particular, it's been reported that when people are sleep deprived or the quality of their sleep is disrupted that their appetite for sugary food increases. Now, that was always assumed to be due to some metabolic need. That was triggered by the sleep deprivation or by the poor sleep. But in Reading over the study, some of the more important points made by the author's, relate to the fact that well, sleep is known to have incredibly important effects on brain and body from a variety of systems. Immune system malfunctioning Etc. This very organized sequence of particular forms of metabolism being active during particular, phases of sleep, which are very, very well orchestrated. As we know slow-wave sleep and REM sleep being orchestrated, 90 minutes. So call treating cycles and so on and so forth. Is thought to perhaps set up the brain and body to be able to regulate itself in the waking hours. And therefore, when people are sleep deprived or deprived of certain forms or States within sleep such as rapid eye movement, sleep, that it creates A disruption in a particular set of metabolic pathways that we don't want to leave too far from this study to Sugar metabolism in the neural circuits control in Sugar metabolism, but I will say this. If you look at the sum total of the data on Obesity or on type 2 diabetes, or on metabolic syndrome of any kind, you almost always see disruption in sleep. Some of those could be due to sleep apnea caused by even just the size of somebody's neck or the weight of their body. In other words, we don't know the direction of the effect, right? Metabolic syndrome. That could disrupt sleep which disrupted metabolic syndrome is an indie, the authors point out quite appropriately that they don't understand the direction of the effect that they observe either. But there is now a plethora of data pointing to the fact that getting quality sleep each night helps regulate, not only appetite, but also the specific forms of metabolism that drive specific appetites. So the takeaway is while there are extravagant and potent and interesting ways to regulate, blood glucose everything from cinnamon to lemon juice, to berberine to sodium cap rate to behavioral, tools to the mere, understanding of how the direct and indirect Pathways go from the gut to dopamine Etc. If you're not establishing the Firm Foundation of proper metabolism. All of those things are going to be sort of rearranging deck. Chairs on the Titanic has sometimes described. So we can't overstate the importance of getting regular sufficient amount of high-quality sleep, at least 80% of the time, not just for sake of immune system function for Clear thinking etcetera, but also for properly, regulating our metabolism, including our sugar metabolism. Thank you for joining me for this discussion about sugar and the nervous system and how they are regulating each other in both the brain and body. If you're enjoying an or learning from the podcast, please subscribe to my YouTube channel. That's a terrific zero-cost way to support us, please also subscribe to a podcast on Apple and Spotify and on Apple, you have the opportunity to leave us up to a five-star review. If you have comments and feedback or suggestions for future Topics in, guess please. Leave those in the comment section on YouTube. In addition, please check out the sponsors mentioned at the beginning of today's podcast. That's the best way to support us. In addition. We have a patreon. It's patreon.com Andrew huberman. And there you can support the podcast at any level that you. Like. If you're not already following to bring my lab on Instagram or Twitter. Please do so there. I cover science and science-based tools that sometimes overlap with the content of the podcast but often is distinct from the content of the podcast. Today's episode end on Mini previous episodes of the government Lab podcast. I just got supplements while supplements are necessary for everybody. Many people drive tremendous benefit from them. When issue with supplement is that if you're going to take them, you want to make sure that they are the absolute highest quality. For that reason, we partner with Thorn. That's Thorne because Thorn is partnered for instance with all the major sports teams and the Mayo Clinic. There's tremendous trust in the fact that Thorne supplements contain, the specific amounts of supplements are listed on the bottle and that the quality of the ingredients include are of the very Highest standards if you want to see the supplements that I take, you can go to Thorn. Calm, the letter used huberman and you can get 20% off any of the supplements listed there. Also. If you navigate further into the thorn site through that portal, thorne.com used huberman. You can also get 20% off any of the other supplements that thorn makes. Also. If you haven't yet signed up for the huberman, lab neural network newsletter. It's a semi monthly newsletter that includes summaries of various podcast as of actionable protocols. It's completely cost-free. You simply provide your email. We have a very clear privacy policy. We do not share your email. If you want to get the newsletter. You can go to huberman. Lab.com., Just go to the menu. If you can find the sign up there, easily can also be some examples of previous newsletters without having to sign up at all. And last but certainly not least. Thank you for your interest in science.
